North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Part 2. Tax, Revenue and Grant Anticipation Notes.

§ 159-168.
“Unit” defined.

For purposes of this Part, “unit,” “unit of local government,” or “issuing unit” mean a “unit of local government” as defined by G.S. 159-7(b) and a “public authority” as defined by G.S. 159-7(b).

History.

1973, c. 494, s. 40; 1975, c. 674, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For symposium on municipal finance, see 1976 Duke L.J. 1051 (1976).

§ 159-169.
Tax anticipation notes.

A unit of local government having the power to levy taxes is authorized to borrow money for the purpose of paying appropriations made for the current fiscal year in anticipation of the collection of taxes due and payable within the fiscal year, and to issue its negotiable notes in evidence thereof. A tax anticipation note shall mature not later than 30 days after the close of the fiscal year in which it is issued, and may not be renewed beyond that time.

No tax anticipation loan shall be made if the amount thereof, together with the amount of tax anticipation notes authorized or outstanding on the date the loan is authorized, would exceed fifty percent (50%) of the amount of taxes uncollected as of the date of the proposed loan authorization, as certified in writing to the governing board by the chief financial officer of the issuing unit. Each tax anticipation note shall bear on its face or reverse the following certificate signed by the finance officer: “This note and all other tax anticipation notes of (issuing unit) authorized or outstanding as of (date) amount to fifty percent (50%) or less of the amount of taxes for the current fiscal year uncollected as of the above date.” No tax anticipation note shall be valid without this certificate.

The faith and credit of the issuing unit are hereby pledged for the payment of each tax anticipation note issued under this section according to its terms, and the power and obligation of the issuing unit to levy taxes and raise other revenues for the prompt payment of such notes shall be unrestricted as to rate or amount, notwithstanding any other provisions of law.

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 12; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(12); 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, s. 4; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 37.

Cross References.

As to limitations upon the increase of public debt, see N.C. Const., Art. V, § 4.

§ 159-170.
Revenue anticipation notes.

Authorization; Term. — A unit of local government or a nonprofit corporation or association operating or leasing a public hospital as defined in

G.S. 159-39

, is authorized to borrow money for the purpose of paying appropriations made or expenses budgeted or incurred for the current fiscal year in anticipation of the receipt of revenues, other than taxes, estimated in its budget to be realized or collected in cash during the fiscal year, and to issue its negotiable notes in evidence thereof. A nonprofit corporation or association operating or leasing a public hospital may only borrow money pursuant to this section if it is legally entitled to collect and pledge such revenues to the payment of the noted as provided in this section. A revenue anticipation note shall mature not later than 30 days after the close of the fiscal year in which it is issued, and may not be renewed beyond that time.

Limit on Amount; Disclosure. — No revenue anticipation loan shall be made if the amount thereof, together with the amount of all revenue anticipation notes authorized or outstanding on the date the loan is authorized, would exceed eighty percent (80%) of the revenues of the issuing unit or the nonprofit corporation or association operating or leasing a public hospital, other than taxes, estimated in its budget to be realized or collected in cash during the fiscal year. Each revenue anticipation note shall bear on its face a statement to the effect that it is payable solely from budgeted nontax revenues of the issuing unit or the nonprofit corporation or association operating or leasing a public hospital and that the faith and credit of the issuing unit or, in the case of revenue anticipation notes issued by a nonprofit corporation or association operating or leasing a public hospital, the local government unit that owns the public hospital are not pledged for the payment of the note. Each note shall also bear on its face or reverse the following certificate signed by the finance officer: “This note and all other revenue anticipation notes of (issuer) authorized or outstanding as of (date) amount to eighty percent (80%) or less of the budgeted nontax revenues for the current fiscal year as of the above date.” No revenue anticipation note shall be valid without this certificate.

Faith and Credit Not Pledged. — Revenue anticipation notes issued under this section shall be special obligations of the issuing unit or the nonprofit corporation or association operating or leasing a public hospital. Neither the credit nor the taxing power of the issuing unit or, in the case of revenue anticipation notes issued by a nonprofit corporation or association operating or leasing a public hospital, the local government unit that owns the public hospital may be pledged for the payment of revenue anticipation notes. No holder of a revenue anticipation note shall have the right to compel the exercise of the taxing power by the issuing unit or, in the case of revenue anticipation notes issued by a nonprofit corporation or association operating or leasing a public hospital, the local government unit that owns the public hospital or the forfeiture of any of its property in connection with any default thereon.

Any revenue anticipation notes issued by a nonprofit corporation or association operating or leasing a public hospital pursuant to this section are subject to the approval of the city, county, hospital district, or hospital authority which owns the hospital. Approval of the city, county, hospital district, or hospital authority may be withheld only under one or more of the following circumstances:

The contract would cause the city, county, hospital district, or hospital authority to breach or violate any covenant in an existing financing instrument entered into by such entity.

The contract would restrict the ability of the city, county, hospital district, or hospital authority to incur anticipated bank eligible indebtedness under federal tax laws.

The entering into of the contract would have a material adverse impact on the credit ratings of the city, county, hospital district, or hospital authority or otherwise materially interfere with an anticipated financing by such entity.

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 12; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(12); 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, s. 4; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 38; 1999-386, s. 3.

§ 159-171.
Grant anticipation notes.

A unit of local government is authorized to borrow money for the purpose of paying appropriations made for a capital project in anticipation of the receipt of moneys from grant commitments for such capital project from the State or the United States or any agencies of either, and to issue its negotiable notes in evidence thereof. Grant anticipation notes shall mature not later than 12 months after the estimated completion date of such capital project as determined by the governing body of the unit of local government and may be renewed from time to time, but no renewal shall mature later than 12 months after the estimated completion date of such capital project.

No grant anticipation note may be issued if the amount thereof, together with the amount of all other notes authorized or issued in anticipation of the same grant commitment, shall exceed ninety percent (90%) of the unpaid amount of said grant commitment. Each note shall bear on its face a statement to the effect that it is payable solely from moneys received from a described grant and that the faith and credit of the issuing unit are not pledged for the payment thereof, and on its face or reverse the following certificate signed by the finance officer: “This note and all other grant anticipation notes of (issuing unit) authorized or outstanding as of (date) and issued or to be issued in anticipation of (describe grant commitment) amount to ninety percent (90%) or less of the unpaid amount of said grant commitment.” No grant anticipation note shall be valid without this certificate.

Grant anticipation notes issued under this section shall be special obligations of the issuing unit. Neither the credit nor the taxing power of the issuing unit may be pledged for the payment of grant anticipation notes, and no holder of such notes shall have the right to compel the exercise of the taxing power by the issuing unit or the forfeiture of any of its property in connection with any default thereon.

History.

1975, c. 674, s. 1.

§ 159-172.
Authorization and issuance of notes.

Notes issued under this Part shall be authorized by resolution of the governing board of the issuing unit. The resolution shall fix the maximum aggregate principal amount of notes to be issued thereunder, and may authorize any officer to fix, within the limitations prescribed by the resolution, the rate of interest, the place or places of payment, and the denomination or denominations of the notes. Notes that are represented by instruments shall be signed with the manual or facsimile signatures of the officers designated by the government board for that purpose, but at least one manual signature (which may be the signature of the representative of the Commission to the Commission’s certificate) must appear on each note that is represented by an instrument. Several notes may be issued under one authorization so long as the aggregate principal amount of notes outstanding at any one time does not exceed the limits of the authorization.

Before any notes may be issued pursuant to this Part, they must be approved by the Commission. In determining whether to approve the issuance of notes, the Commission may consider (i) the reasonableness of the budget estimates of the taxes or other revenues in anticipation of which the tax or revenue anticipation notes are to be issued, (ii) the firm and binding character of the grant commitment in anticipation of which the grant anticipation notes are to be issued, (iii) whether the amount of the notes, together with the amount of other authorized or outstanding notes issued or to be issued in anticipation of the same taxes or other revenues or grant commitments, exceeds the limitations prescribed in

G.S. 159-169

, 159-170 or 159-171 as the case may be, and (iv) any other matters that the Commission considers to have a bearing on whether the issue should be approved. The Commission shall approve the issuance of the notes if, upon the information and evidence it receives, it finds and determines that (i) the issue is necessary and expedient, (ii) the budget estimates of the taxes or other revenues are reasonable or the grant commitment is firm and binding, and (iii) the amount of the notes, together with the amounts of other authorized or outstanding notes issued or to be issued in anticipation of the same taxes or other revenues or grant commitments do not exceed the appropriate limitations prescribed by this Part. An order approving an issue shall not be regarded as an approval of the legality of the notes in any respect.

Notes issued under this Part shall be sold by the Commission at public or private sale according to such procedures as the Commission may prescribe. Each such note that is represented by an instrument shall bear on its face or reverse a certificate signed by the secretary of the Commission or an assistant designated by him that the issuance of the note has been approved under the provisions of The Local Government Finance Act. Such signature may be a manual or facsimile signature as the Commission may determine. Each note that is not represented by an instrument shall be evidenced by a writing relating to such note, which writing shall identify such note or the issue of which it is a part, bear such certificate and be on file with the Commission. The certificate shall be conclusive evidence that the requirements of this Part have been observed, and no note without the Commission’s certificate or with respect to which a writing bearing such certificate has not been filed with the Commission shall be valid.

When the notes are executed, they shall be delivered to the State Treasurer who shall deliver them to the order of the purchaser and collect the purchase price or proceeds. The Treasurer shall also collect from their purchaser the purchase price or proceeds of notes that are not represented by instruments. The Treasurer shall then deduct from the proceeds the Commission’s expense in connection with the issue, and remit the net proceeds to the official depository of the unit after assurance that the deposit will be adequately secured as required by law. If the notes have been issued to renew outstanding notes, the Treasurer, in lieu of collecting the purchase price or proceeds, may provide for the exchange of the newly issued notes for the notes to be renewed.

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 14; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(14); C.S., s. 2935; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, s. 4; 1931, c. 293; 1939, c. 231, s. 1; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 39; 1975, c. 674, ss. 3-5; 1983, c. 322, ss. 10-12.

§§ 159-173 through 159-175.

Reserved for future codification purposes.